Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-571
Hunt through the Internet, defined.

For purposes of sections 37-571 to 37-573, hunt through the Internet means to hunt living wildlife in real time using Internet services to remotely control actual firearms and to remotely discharge live ammunition.

Laws 2007, LB504, § 2.